Utah statutes.
63M-1-1405.   Agreements with other governmental entities.

The office may enter into agreements with state or federal agencies to accept services, quarters, or facilities as a contribution in carrying out the duties and functions of the office.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

